Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3523
Articles of association; amend; property tax rate; amendment; procedure.

Whenever a majority of the board of trustees shall deem it advisable to amend the articles of association of the community improvement district to change the maximum permitted levy rate, and after a proposed amendment to the articles of association has been signed by a majority of the owners having an interest in the real property within the limits of the community improvement district, the community improvement district clerk shall file an application for such amendment with the city or village clerk with a request that the maximum permitted levy rate be changed, all in the same manner as approval of the initial articles of association pursuant to the Community Improvement District Act. The city or village clerk shall process any such request in the same manner as an initial application for approval of articles of association, shall schedule a hearing, publish notices, and mail notices to any owner of property in the community improvement district who did not sign the proposed amendment, and such city council or village board of trustees may approve the proposed amendment by ordinance in a similar manner to the initial articles of association as provided in section 18-3506.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 23.
April 17, 2026